Maryland, session 2025, HB0683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–8A–28.
The court may enter a judgment of restitution against the parent, GUARDIAN, OR
CUSTODIAN of a child[,] OR the child[, or both] as provided under Title 11, Subtitle 6 of
the Criminal Procedure Article.
3–8A–29.
[A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 3–610 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE, A court
may not order a parent, guardian, custodian, or child to pay:
(1) A fine, fee, or cost under this subtitle; or
(2) A sum of money to cover the support of a child under this subtitle.
Article – Criminal Law
1–403.
(A) A PARENT, GUARDIAN, OR CUSTODIAN OF A CHILD MAY NOT
INTENTIONALLY, KNOWINGLY, RECKLESSLY, OR NEGLIGENTLY ACT OR FAIL TO ACT
IN A MANNER THAT RESULTS IN THE CHILD COMMITTING A CRIME OR DELINQUENT
ACT.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION:
(1) IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 30 DAYS, OR A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $2,500, OR BOTH;
(2) SHALL PARTICIPATE IN:
(I) ALL COURT PROCEEDINGS RELATED TO THE CHILD’S
DELINQUENT OR CRIMINAL ACT; AND
(II) ALL TREATMENT, COUNSELING, OR DIVERSION PROGRAMS
THE COURT ORDERS THE CHILD TO PARTICIPATE IN; AND
(3) SHALL PAY ANY COURT COSTS RELATED TO THE CHILD’S
DELINQUENT OR CRIMINAL ACT.

HOUSE BILL 683 3
(C) WILLFUL FAILURE OF AN INDIVIDUAL TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION IS CONTEMPT OF COURT.
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–604.
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section and notwithstanding any other law, if
a child is the defendant or child respondent AND THE COURT ORDERS PAYMENT OF
RESTITUTION, the court [may order the child, the child’s parent, or both to pay restitution]
SHALL:
(1) ORDER THE CHILD’S PARENT, GUARDIAN, OR CUSTODIAN TO PAY
THE RESTITUTION; OR
(2) IF THE RESTITUTION IS OWED TO THE CHILD’S PARENT,
GUARDIAN, OR CUSTODIAN, ORDER THE CHILD TO PAY THE RESTITUTION.
(b) A judgment of restitution for $10,000 issued under Part I of this subtitle is the
absolute limit for each child’s acts arising out of a single incident.
(c) (1) A court may not enter a judgment of restitution against a parent,
GUARDIAN, OR CUSTODIAN under Part I of this subtitle unless the parent, GUARDIAN,
OR CUSTODIAN has been afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard and to present
evidence.
(2) A hearing under this subsection may be held as part of the sentencing
or disposition hearing.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.